seg/mar.2.dix
    <pardef n="हात__n_m">
      <e>     <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ात<j/></l><r>ात<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ा<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ा<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ां<j/></l><r>ां<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ां<j/></l><r>ां<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="अंथरूण__n_nt">
      <e>     <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ा<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ा<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ं</l><r>ं<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>े</l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ां<j/></l><r>ां<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ां<j/></l><r>ां<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="रस्त/ा__n_m">
      <e>     <p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्या<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्या<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्यां<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्यां<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="कोय__n_f">
      <e>     <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ी<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ी<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ीं<j/></l><r>ीं<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ीं<j/></l><r>ीं<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="सुट्ट/ी__n_f">
      <e>     <p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ी<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ी<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्या</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्यां<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्यां<j/></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="लढा/ई__n_f">
      <e>     <p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ई<j/></l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ई<j/></l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ाया</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ायां<j/></l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ायां<j/></l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="भांड/े__n_nt">
      <e>     <p><l>े</l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l></l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>ं</l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>्</l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्या<j/></l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्या<j/></l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ी</l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्यां<j/></l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्यां<j/></l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="विद्य/ा__n_f">
      <e>     <p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>े<j/></l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>े<j/></l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ा<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ां<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="दुसर/ा__n_m">
      <e>     <p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्या<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्या<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्या<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्या<j/></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="वेळ__n_f">
      <e>     <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>े<j/></l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>े<j/></l><r>े<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्यां<j/></l><r>्यां<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>्यां<j/></l><r>्यां<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="चुरमुरा">                        <i>चुरमुर</i><par n="दुसर/ा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="बोजवारा">                        <i>बोजवार</i><par n="दुसर/ा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="घुरघुरा">                        <i>घुरघुर</i><par n="दुसर/ा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="ससेमिरा">                        <i>ससेमिर</i><par n="दुसर/ा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="चारा">                           <i>चार</i><par n="दुसर/ा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="नजर">                            <i>नजर</i><par n="वेळ__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="धर्मनिश्ठ">                      <i>धर्मनिश्ठ</i><par n="वेळ__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="खुण">                            <i>खुण</i><par n="वेळ__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="आचारनिश्ठ">                      <i>आचारनिश्ठ</i><par n="वेळ__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="षेंग">                           <i>षेंग</i><par n="वेळ__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="भाषा">                           <i>भाष</i><par n="विद्य/ा__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="शक्यता">                         <i>शक्यत</i><par n="विद्य/ा__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="गंधवार्ता">                      <i>गंधवार्त</i><par n="विद्य/ा__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="नम्रता">                         <i>नम्रत</i><par n="विद्य/ा__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="संध्या">                         <i>संध्य</i><par n="विद्य/ा__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="विज्ञापना">                      <i>विज्ञापन</i><par n="विद्य/ा__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="खाणेपिणे">                       <i>खाणेपिण</i><par n="भांड/े__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="अळंबे">                          <i>अळंब</i><par n="भांड/े__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="गाळणे">                          <i>गाळण</i><par n="भांड/े__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="कडवे">                           <i>कडव</i><par n="भांड/े__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="मुंडके">                         <i>मुंडक</i><par n="भांड/े__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="पोवळे">                          <i>पोवळ</i><par n="भांड/े__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="लढाई">                          <i>लढा</i><par n="लढा/ई__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="खतावणी">                         <i>खतावण</i><par n="सुट्ट/ी__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="लिपी">                        <i>लिप</i><par n="सुट्ट/ी__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="चुनेगच्ची">                      <i>चुनेगच्च</i><par n="सुट्ट/ी__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="कामटी">                          <i>कामट</i><par n="सुट्ट/ी__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="पराणी">                          <i>पराण</i><par n="सुट्ट/ी__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="तोडणी">                          <i>तोडण</i><par n="सुट्ट/ी__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="फोड">                      <i>फोड</i><par n="कोय__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="बिशाद">                <i>बिशाद</i><par n="कोय__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="जूट">                      <i>जूट</i><par n="कोय__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="लेस">                      <i>लेस</i><par n="कोय__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="पआऊलवाट">          <i>पआऊलवाट</i><par n="कोय__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="सवय">                      <i>सवय</i><par n="कोय__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="तरतूद">                <i>तरतूद</i><par n="कोय__n_f" /></e>
    <e lm="भ्रमिष्ट">                       <i>भ्रमिष्ट</i><par n="हात__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="श्रीमंत">                        <i>श्रीमंत</i><par n="हात__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="गनीम">                           <i>गनीम</i><par n="हात__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="नागबंद">                         <i>नागबंद</i><par n="हात__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="साटोप">                          <i>साटोप</i><par n="हात__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="ताम्रपट">                        <i>ताम्रपट</i><par n="हात__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="भिंताड">                         <i>भिंताड</i><par n="अंथरूण__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="शेणकुट">                         <i>शेणकुट</i><par n="अंथरूण__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="एकमत">                           <i>एकमत</i><par n="अंथरूण__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="मळसूत्र">                        <i>मळसूत्र</i><par n="अंथरूण__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="रानडुक्कर">                      <i>रानडुक्कर</i><par n="अंथरूण__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="वेखंड">                          <i>वेखंड</i><par n="अंथरूण__n_nt" /></e>
    <e lm="खाडा">                           <i>खाड</i><par n="रस्त/ा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="धागा">                           <i>धाग</i><par n="रस्त/ा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="हाल्या">                         <i>हाल्य</i><par n="रस्त/ा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="मेळा">                           <i>मेळ</i><par n="रस्त/ा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="रणगाडा">                         <i>रणगाड</i><par n="रस्त/ा__n_m" /></e>
    <e lm="तहनामा">                         <i>तहनाम</i><par n="रस्त/ा__n_m" /></e>
